Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-19,123
Merger with foreign corporation.

(a) Except as provided in section 21-19,119, one or more foreign business or nonprofit corporations may merge with one or more domestic nonprofit corporations if:

(1) The merger is permitted by the law of the state or country under whose law each foreign corporation is incorporated and each foreign corporation complies with that law in effecting the merger;

(2) The foreign corporation complies with section 21-19,121 if it is the surviving corporation of the merger; and

(3) Each domestic nonprofit corporation complies with the provisions of sections 21-19,118 to 21-19,120 and, if it is the surviving corporation of the merger, with section 21-19,121.

(b) Upon the merger taking effect, the surviving foreign business or nonprofit corporation is deemed to agree that it may be served with process within or without this state in any proceeding in the courts of this state brought against it.

Laws 1996, LB 681, § 123.